Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.671] DISCLOSURE OF APPLICATION OF FUNDS FROM A PATIENT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM TO A DEDUCTIBLE. new text end new text begin A health plan company must include in the summary of benefits and coverage a statement that indicates whether the health plan company applied money from a patient assistance program, as defined in section 62J.84, subdivision 2, paragraph (h), to an enrollee's deductible. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end